Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3326
Veterinary technicians; rules and regulations.

The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations providing for (1) licensure of veterinary technicians meeting the requirements of section 38-3325 and (2) standards for the level of supervision required for particular delegated animal health care tasks and which determine which tasks may be performed by a licensed veterinary technician and by unlicensed assistants. The level of supervision may be immediate supervision, direct supervision, or indirect supervision as determined by the department, with the recommendation of the board, based upon the complexity and requirements of the task.

Laws 2000, LB 833, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 58;

Laws 2003, LB 245, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,166;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1108.